src/morphology/affixes/verbs.lexc
!! Verb inflection
!! ---------------
!! Verbs in the Estonian language inflect for number and persons.

LEXICON V-sööma
+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1:%>n   K   ;
+V+Ind+Prs+Sg2:%>d   K   ;
+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3:%>b   K   ;
+V+Ind+Prs+Pl1:%>me   K   ;
+V+Ind+Prs+Pl2:%>te   K   ;
+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3:%>vad   K   ;
+V+Inf:%>ma    K   ;
+V+Inf+Ill:%>a%^RVws K ; ! How should this be marked?
+V+Der/mine:mi   N-hobune   ;

! vim: set ft=xfst-lexc:
